Hawaii statutes.
§576B-202 Duration of personal
jurisdiction. Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this State
in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of this State relating to a
support order continues as long as a tribunal of this State has continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to
enforce its order as provided by sections 576B-205, 576B-206, and 576B-211. [L
1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next